Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Limits on access by officials engaged in immigration enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or charter school employee must not consent to a federal, state, or local official entering a school site for purposes of immigration enforcement unless the official provides the school employee with a valid judicial warrant. The school employee must request the federal, state, or local official to provide valid identification, and must grant entry to only the areas identified in the judicial warrant. new text end new text begin (b) A school employee granting entry to a federal, state, or local official engaged in immigration enforcement must immediately notify the district superintendent or person having administrative control of a charter school, and the district or charter school's general counsel or other designated legal representative. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not prohibit entry by a federal, state, or local official administering a state or federally supported educational program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SEVERABILITY.new text end new text begin If application of this act to any person, entity, or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional and void, the remaining provisions of the law shall remain valid as applied to any other person, entity, or circumstance. new text end